Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-933
Cemetery; acquisition; title.

Where real estate for a cemetery under section 17-926 is acquired by gift or devise, the title shall vest in the city or village upon the conditions imposed by the donor and upon acceptance by the mayor and city council or chairperson and village board of trustees. Where such real estate is acquired by purchase or by virtue of exercise of the right of eminent domain, the title shall vest absolutely in such city or village. Nothing in sections 17-933 to 17-937 shall be construed in any manner to affect cemeteries belonging to any religious organization or society, lodge, or fraternal society.

Laws 1929, c. 46, § 8, p. 197;

C.S.1929, § 17-548;

R.S.1943, § 17-933;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 266.